Alabama, session 2026rs, HB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 34-3-43.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§34-3-43.1
The Board of Commissioners of the Alabama State Bar is
an agency of the Judicial Branch of state government.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB149 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 27-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 05-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2